Illinois, session 104th, HB3927.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for objects and purposes 7hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and 8contingent expenses of the Environmental Protection Agency 9for:10ADMINISTRATION11Payable from U.S. Environmental Protection Fund:12  For Contractual Services..........................2,500,00013  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,000,00014Payable from Underground Storage Tank Fund:15  For Contractual Services..........................1,000,00016  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,000,00017Payable from Solid Waste Management Fund:18  For Contractual Services..........................1,000,00019  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,000,00020Payable from Subtitle D Management Fund:21  For Contractual Services............................200,00022  For Electronic Data Processing......................200,00023Payable from Water Revolving Fund:  HB3927- 2 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1  For Contractual Services..........................1,500,0002  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,700,0003Payable from Hazardous Waste Fund:4  For Contractual Services............................150,0005  For Electronic Data Processing......................250,0006Payable from the Illinois Clean Water Fund:7  For Contractual Services............................200,0008  For Electronic Data Processing......................500,0009Payable from Environmental Protection 10 Permit and Inspection Fund:11  For Contractual Services............................500,00012  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,450,00013  For Refunds.........................................100,00014Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund:15  For Contractual Services............................600,00016  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,250,000 17    Section 10. The sum of $1,453,800, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated to the Environmental 19Protection Agency from the EPA Special State Projects Trust 20Fund for the purpose of funding all costs associated with 21environmental programs, including prior years' costs. 22    Section 15. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 23be necessary, is appropriated from the U.S. Environmental 24Protection Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all   HB3927- 3 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1costs associated with environmental projects as defined by 2federal assistance awards. 3    Section 20. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the Oil Spill Response Fund 5to the Environmental Protection Agency for use in accordance 6with Section 25c-1 of the Environmental Protection Act. 7    Section 25. The amount of $4,000,000, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 9Protection Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency 10for awards and grants as directed by the Environmental 11Protection Trust Fund Commission. 12    Section 30. The sum of $32,000,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated to the Environmental 14Protection Agency from the Motor Fuel Tax Fund for deposit 15into the Vehicle Inspection Fund. 16    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 18purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the 19Environmental Protection Agency for:20AIR POLLUTION CONTROL21Payable from U.S. Environmental22Protection Fund:  HB3927- 4 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1  For all expenses related to2   environmental projects as defined by3   federal assistance awards, including 4   prior years' costs..............................14,114,0005  For Use by the City of Chicago......................412,0006  For all expenses related to Clean Air7   Activities and other environmental8   projects as defined by federal assistance9   awards, including prior years' costs.............4,950,00010    Total                                         $19,476,00011Payable from the Clean Air Act Permit Fund 12 For Clean Air Act and Energy Act Activities:13  For funding of Clean Air Act Title V Activities14   in accordance with Clean Air Act Amendments15   of 1990.........................................19,915,00016  For Contractual Services.........................1,000,000 17  For Enforcement of the Clean Air Act and18   the Energy Transition Act........................7,000,00019Payable from the Vehicle Inspection Fund:20  For Personal Services.............................5,535,60021  For State Contributions to State22   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,573,30023  For State Contributions to24   Social Security....................................423,50025  For Group Insurance...............................1,693,20026  For Contractual Services, including  HB3927- 5 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1   prior years' costs..............................20,000,0002  For Travel...........................................10,0003  For Commodities......................................15,0004  For Printing.........................................20,0005  For Equipment.......................................395,0006  For Telecommunication Services......................250,0007  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................20,0008Payable from the Environmental Protection 9 Permit and Inspection Fund for Air 10 Permit and Inspection Activities:11  For Personal Services and other Expenses.........11,296,300 12    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 13thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the 14Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund to the Environmental Protection 15Agency for the purpose of administering the Electric Vehicle 16Rebate Program and the Ethanol Fuel Research Program:17  For Personal Services and Other18   Expenses...........................................600,00019  For Grants and Rebates, including20   prior years' costs..............................14,000,00021    Total                                         $14,600,000 22    Section 45. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary, is appropriated from the U.S. Environmental 24Protection Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for   HB3927- 6 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1expenses and grants connected with the Climate Pollution 2Reduction Grant planning program as authorized by Section 360114 of the Inflation Reduction Act (IRA) of 2022. 4    Section 50. The sum of $150,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the Alternative Compliance 6Market Account Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 7all costs associated with the emissions reduction market 8program. 9LABORATORY SERVICES 10    Section 55. The sum of $1,330,200, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Community Water 12Supply Laboratory Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency 13for the purpose of performing laboratory testing of samples 14from community water supplies and for administrative costs of 15the Agency and the Community Water Supply Testing Council. 16    Section 60. The sum of $574,400, or so much thereof as may 17be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 18Laboratory Certification Fund to the Environmental Protection 19Agency for the purpose of administering the laboratory 20certification program. 21    Section 65. The sum of $2,942,200, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Clean   HB3927- 7 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1Water Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for the 2purpose of laboratory analysis of samples. 3    Section 70. The following named amounts, or so much 4thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 5purposes hereinafter named are appropriated to the 6Environmental Protection Agency for:7LAND POLLUTION CONTROL8Payable from the Road Fund:9  For deposit into the Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund10   for electric vehicle grants and rebates........12,000,000 11Payable from U.S. Environmental 12 Protection Fund:13  For Underground Storage Tank Program, including14   prior years' costs...............................3,075,00015  For all expenses related to environmental16   projects as defined by federal assistance17   awards, including prior years' costs............10,378,40018  For all expenses related to remedial,19   preventive or corrective actions in accordance20   with the Federal Comprehensive and Liability21   Act of 1980 and other environmental22   projects as defined by federal assistance23   awards, including prior years' costs............10,500,00024    Total                                         $35,953,400   HB3927- 8 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1    Section 75. The sum of $2,500,000 or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the U.S. Environmental 3Protection Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 4expenses related to The State and Tribal Brownfields response 5program authorized by Section 128(a) of the Comprehensive 6Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act. 7    Section 80. The following named sums, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Environmental 9Protection Agency for the purpose of funding the Underground 10Storage Tank Program:11Payable from the Underground Storage Tank Fund:12  For Personal Services.............................6,762,70013  For State Contributions to State14   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,143,80015  For State Contributions to16   Social Security....................................517,40017  For Group Insurance...............................1,593,60018  For Contractual Services..........................5,300,00019  For Travel...........................................40,00020  For Commodities......................................20,00021  For Printing..........................................5,00022  For Equipment.......................................843,00023  For Telecommunication Services......................145,00024  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................16,30025  For Contracts for Site Remediation and  HB3927- 9 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1   for Reimbursements to Eligible Owners/2   Operators of Leaking Underground3   Storage Tanks, including claims4   submitted in prior years........................40,100,0005    Total                                         $58,486,800 6    Section 85. The following named sums, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Solid Waste 8Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for use 9in accordance with Section 22.15 of the Environmental 10Protection Act:11  For Personal Services.............................7,679,50012  For State Contributions to State13   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,569,90014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security....................................587,50016  For Group Insurance...............................2,523,20017  For Contractual Services............................100,00018  For Travel...........................................40,00019  For Commodities......................................10,00020  For Printing.........................................35,00021  For Equipment........................................34,50022  For Telecommunication Services......................100,00023  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................15,00024  For Refunds...........................................5,00025  For financial assistance to units of local  HB3927- 10 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1   government for operations under delegation2   agreements, including prior years' costs.........2,500,0003    Total                                         $17,199,600 4    Section 90. The sum of $750,000, or so much therefore as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Solid Waste 6Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all 7costs associated with the implementation of a Drug Take-Back 8program pursuant to the Drug Take-Back Act. 9    Section 95. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much therefore 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Solid Waste 11Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all 12costs associated with solid waste management activities, 13including prior years' costs. 14    Section 100. The sum of $753,800, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the Solid Waste Management 16Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for use in 17accordance with the Consumer Electronics Recycling Act (CERA). 18    Section 105. The sum of $3,267,300, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Subtitle D 20Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for the 21purpose of funding the Subtitle D permit program in accordance 22with Section 22.44 of the Environmental Protection Act.   HB3927- 11 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1    Section 110. The sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Brownfields 3Redevelopment Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 4all expenses related to the Municipal Brownfields 5Redevelopment Grant program. 6    Section 115. The sum of $4,500,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Brownfields 8Redevelopment Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 9financial assistance for Brownfields redevelopment in 10accordance with 58.3(5), 58.13 and 58.15 of the Environmental 11Protection Act, including prior years' costs. 12    Section 120. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the Brownfields 14Redevelopment Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 15all expenses related to the Brownfields Community Wide 16Assessment Program. 17    Section 125. The following named amounts, or so much 18thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Used 19Tire Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency 20for purposes as provided for in Section 55.6 of the 21Environmental Protection Act:22  For Personal Services.............................4,515,600  HB3927- 12 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1  For State Contributions to State2   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,099,2003  For State Contributions to4   Social Security....................................345,5005  For Group Insurance...............................1,162,0006  For Contractual Services, including7   prior years' costs...............................3,500,0008  For Travel...........................................20,0009  For Commodities......................................10,00010  For Printing.........................................10,00011  For Equipment........................................20,00012  For Telecommunication Services.......................50,00013  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................25,00014    Total                                         $11,757,300 15    Section 130. The sum of $3,211,400, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Drycleaner 17Environmental Response Trust Fund to the Environmental 18Protection Agency for use in accordance with the Drycleaner 19Environmental Response Trust Fund Act, including prior years' 20costs. 21    Section 135. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Renewable Energy 23Resources Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency to 24provide a grant to Joliet Junior College for purposes of   HB3927- 13 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1funding education and training for renewable energy and energy 2efficiency technology, and for the operations and services of 3the Illinois Green Economy Network, pursuant to Section 6-5 of 4the Renewable Energy, Energy Efficiency, and Coal Resources 5Development Law of 1997. 6    Section 140. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Clean 8Water Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency to provide a 9grant to Lewis and Clark Community College for purposes of the 10National Great Rivers Research and Education Center (NGRREC). 11    Section 145. The following named sums, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Environmental 13Protection Agency for use in accordance with Section 22.2 of 14the Environmental Protection Act:15Payable from the Hazardous Waste Fund:16  For all expenses related to Hazardous Waste17   Remediation, including prior years' costs.......17,544,00018  For Refunds..........................................50,00019    Total                                         $17,594,000 20    Section 150. The sum of $1,300,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 22Protection Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency 23for all expenses related to removal or mediation actions at   HB3927- 14 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1the Worthy Park, Cook County, hazardous waste site. 2    Section 155. The sum of $6,500,600, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 4Protection Permit and Inspection Fund to the Environmental 5Protection Agency for all costs associated with land permit 6and inspection activities. 7    Section 160. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from the Landfill Closure and 9Post-Closure Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 10the purpose of funding closure activities in accordance with 11Section 22.17 of the Environmental Protection Act. 12    Section 165. The sum of $2,200,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 14to the Environmental Protection Agency for expenses and grants 15connected with the HOMES Rebate Program as authorized by 16Section 50121 of the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (IRA) and 17the HEEHRA Rebate Program by Section 50122 of the Inflation 18Reduction Act of 2022 (IRA). 19    Section 170. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 21to the Environmental Protection Agency for expenses and grants 22connected with the Energy Audit Training Program.   HB3927- 15 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1    Section 175. The sum of $7,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 3to the Environmental Protection Agency for expenses and grants 4connected with enforcement of the Illinois Energy Conservation 5Code. 6    Section 180. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 8to the Environmental Protection Agency for expenses and grants 9connected with the State Energy Program, including prior 10years' costs. 11    Section 185. The sum of $14,260,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 13to the Environmental Protection Agency for costs associated 14with State Energy Programs as authorized by Title I of 15Division D in Section 40109 of the Infrastructure Investment 16and Jobs Act (IIJA). 17    Section 190. The sum of $2,596,400, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 19to the Environmental Protection Agency for costs associated 20with the Energy Revolving Loan Program as authorized by Title 21V of Division D in Section 40502 of the Infrastructure and 22Investment and Jobs Act (IIJA).   HB3927- 16 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1    Section 195. The sum of $2,910,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Energy Fund 3to the Environmental Protection Agency for costs associated 4with the Energy Efficiency and Conservation Block Grant 5Program as authorized by Title V of Division D of the 6Infrastructure and Investment and Jobs Act (IIJA) in 7accordance with Section 544 of the Energy Independence and 8Security Act of 2007. 9    Section 200. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Energy Efficiency 11Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for grants 12pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 6-6 of the Renewable 13Energy, Energy Efficiency, and Coal Resources Development Law 14of 1997. 15    Section 205. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the Energy Efficiency Trust 17Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for operational 18expenses related to administering grants made pursuant to 19subsection (b) of Section 6-6 of the Renewable Energy, Energy 20Efficiency, and Coal Resources Development Law of 1997. 21    Section 210. The sum of $7,100,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated to the Environmental   HB3927- 17 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1Protection Agency from the Federal Energy Fund for all costs 2associated with the Contractor Training Grant program, 3including prior years' costs. 4    Section 215. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the Carbon Dioxide 6Sequestration Administrative Fund to the Environmental 7Protection Agency for all costs associated with the Safety and 8Aid for the Environment in Carbon Capture and Sequestration 9Act (SAFE CCS Act). 10    Section 220. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental Justice 12Grant Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all 13costs associated with issuance of grants in accordance with 14the Safety and Aid for the Environment in Carbon Capture and 15Sequestration Act (SAFE CCS Act). 16    Section 225. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for objects and 18purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 19ordinary and contingent expenses of the Environmental 20Protection Agency for:21BUREAU OF WATER22Payable from U.S. Environmental 23 Protection Fund:  HB3927- 18 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1  For all expenses related to non-point source2   pollution management and special water pollution3   studies and other environmental4   projects as defined by federal assistance5   awards, including prior years' costs.............8,950,0006  For Use by the Department of7   Public Health....................................1,500,0008  For enforcement of actions under the Gulf9   Hypoxia Action Plan pursuant to the10   Infrastructure Investment and11   Jobs Act (IIJA)....................................795,00012  For Expenses Related to Federal Grants and13   Awards, including prior years' costs............15,188,80014  For Water Quality Planning,15   including prior years' costs.......................900,00016  For Use by the Department of Agriculture............160,00017    Total                                         $27,493,800 18    Section 230. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the object and 20purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the 21Environmental Protection Agency:22Payable from the Water Revolving Fund:23  For Administrative Costs of Water Pollution24   Control Revolving Loan Program..................11,717,70025  For Program Support Costs of Water  HB3927- 19 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1   Pollution Control Program.......................21,756,0002  For Administrative Costs of the Drinking3   Water Revolving Loan Program.....................8,629,3004  For Program Support Costs of the Drinking5   Water Program...................................11,210,5006  For Technical Assistance to Small Systems...........735,0007  For Administration of the Public Water8   System Supervision (PWSS) Program,9   Source Water Protection, Development10   And Implementation of Capacity Development,11   and Operator Certification Programs..............3,600,00012  For Clean Water Administration Loan13   Eligible Activities.............................10,000,00014  For Local Assistance and Other 1452(k)15   Activities.......................................5,500,00016    Total                                         $73,148,500 17    Section 235. The sum of $17,030,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Clean 19Water Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for all 20costs associated with clean water activities. 21    Section 240. The sum of $6,303,800, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 23Protection Permit and Inspection Fund to the Environmental 24Protection Agency for all costs associated with water permit   HB3927- 20 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1and inspection activities. 2    Section 245. The sum of $50,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Coal Combustion 4Residual Surface Impoundment Financial Assurance Fund to the 5Environmental Protection Agency for the purpose of funding 6closure activities in accordance with Section 22.59 of the 7Environmental Protection Act. 8    Section 250. The sum of $8,000,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated to the Environmental 10Protection Agency from the Water Revolving Fund for all costs 11associated with Environmental Management System (EMS) Services 12for the Bureau of Water. 13POLLUTION CONTROL BOARD DIVISION 14    Section 255. The amount of $2,156,000, or so much thereof 15as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Underground 16Storage Tank Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for 17case processing of leaking underground storage tank permit and 18claims appeals. 19    Section 260. The sum of $739,300, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary, is appropriated from the Clean Air Act Permit 21Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for costs 22associated with the handling of appeals from permitting and   HB3927- 21 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1other determinations made by the Environmental Protection 2Agency. 3    Section 265. The following named amounts, or so much 4thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 5the Environmental Protection Agency for the objects and 6purposes hereinafter named, to meet the ordinary and 7contingent expenses of the Pollution Control Board Division.8Payable from Pollution Control Board Fund:9  For Operational Expenses.............................25,00010  For Refunds...........................................2,00011    Total                                             $27,000 12    Section 270. The amount of $511,800, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the Used Tire 14Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for the 15purposes as provided for in Section 55.6 of the Environmental 16Protection Act. 17    Section 275. The sum of $50,000, or so much thereof as may 18be necessary, is appropriated from the Drycleaner 19Environmental Response Trust Fund to the Environmental 20Protection Agency for costs associated with handling appeals 21from permitting and other determinations made by the 22Environmental Protection Agency.   HB3927- 22 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1    Section 280. The sum of $1,259,400, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Environmental 3Protection Permit and Inspection Fund to the Environmental 4Protection Agency for costs associated with handling appeals 5from permitting and other determinations made by the 6Environmental Protection Agency. 7ARTICLE 28    Section 5. The sum of $62,000,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 10business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation heretofore 11made in Article 87, Section 5, of Public Act 103-0589 as 12amended, is reappropriated from the VW Settlement 13Environmental Mitigation Fund to the Environmental Protection 14Agency for all costs, including administrative expenses, 15associated with funding eligible mitigation actions that 16achieve reductions of emissions in accordance with the 17Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement relating to the 18Partial Consent Decree between U.S. Department of Justice, 19Volkswagen AG and other settling defendants. 20    Section 10. The sum of $11,171,538, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 22business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriations heretofore 23made in Article 86, Section 185 and Article 87, Section 10, of   HB3927- 23 -OMB104 00073 JCS 10073 b1Public Act 103-0589 as amended, is reappropriated from the 2Energy Efficiency Trust Fund to the Environmental Protection 3Agency for grants pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 6-6 of 4the Renewable Energy, Energy Efficiency, and Coal Resources 5Development Law of 1997. 6    Section 15. The sum of $1,964,678, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 8business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriations heretofore 9made in Article 86, Section 205 and Article 87, Section 15 of 10Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the 11U.S. Environmental Protection Fund to the Environmental 12Protection Agency for enforcement of actions under the Gulf 13Hypoxia Action Plan pursuant to the Infrastructure Investment 14and Jobs Act (IIJA). 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162025.